Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5839.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 16-60-2 of the General Laws in Chapter 16-60 entitled "Council on
Elementary and Secondary Education [See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of
Education Act]" is hereby amended to read as follows:
16-60-2. Appointment of board members.
(a) The governor shall establish the council on elementary and secondary education by
appointing eight (8) ten (10) members of the board of education established pursuant to chapter 97
of this title to serve as members of the council until the expiration of their term and appointment of
their successor as a member of the board of education. The chair of the board of education shall
serve on the council in a voting, ex-officio capacity. Five (5) Six (6) voting members of the council
shall constitute a quorum and the vote of the majority of those present and voting shall be required
for action. The governor shall appoint the chair of the council on an annual basis from among the
eight (8) ten (10) council members.
(b) In addition to the eight (8) ten (10) members appointed by the governor, the Rhode
Island teacher of the year shall serve as an ex-officio and voting member on the council on
elementary and secondary education pursuant to § 16-97-1(c) and (d) 16-97-1(d).
(c) No person shall be eligible for appointment to the board after the effective date of this
act [March 24, 2006] unless he or she is a resident of this state, with the exception of the individual
serving in the ex officio seat as Rhode Island teacher of the year.

(d) There is hereby established a student advisory council to the council on elementary and
secondary education, consisting of one elected high school student representative from each public
secondary school in the state of Rhode Island.
(1) Each public secondary school shall hold elections for its representative to the student
advisory council no earlier than the first (1st) day of March and no later than the end of the second
(2nd) full week of April. Each school shall elect only one representative. Elected members shall be
notified of their election on or before the Friday of the third (3rd) week of April of the year of their
election. No person shall be eligible to be elected to the student advisory council unless at the time
of his or her election he or she is enrolled as a student in a secondary school between the grades of
nine (9) and eleven (11) within the state of Rhode Island. No person shall be allowed to vote if they
are not currently enrolled in a Rhode Island public secondary school between the grades of nine (9)
and eleven (11). If at any time during his or her term of office a member of the student advisory
council ceases to be so enrolled, his or her membership shall be terminated and his or her position
shall be deemed vacant. This vacancy shall be filled by the public secondary school within thirty
(30) school days of the opening of the vacancy.
(2) The student advisory council will serve from the first (1st) day of May of the year it is
elected until the last day of April of the following year. A student may serve no more than three (3)
terms.
(3) Said student advisory council shall meet from time to time quarterly, at a minimum,
and shall consider such matters as it deems appropriate.
(4) Prior to the first (1st) day of June of each annual session the student advisory council
shall adopt a set of bylaws.
(5) Members of the council shall not be compensated for service in attending meetings
except that they shall be reimbursed for necessary expenses incurred in traveling to and from
meetings.
(6) The members of said student advisory council shall, by majority vote prior to the first
(1st) day of June in each year, elect from their members a chairperson who shall serve for a term
of one year beginning on the first (1st) day of June. Said chairperson shall serve as an ex officio
and nonvoting voting member of the council for a term of one year, unless the student advisory
council removes said chairperson from his or her position in a manner described within the bylaws
of that council.
SECTION 2. Section 16-97-1 of the General Laws in Chapter 16-97 entitled "The Rhode
Island Board of Education Act" is hereby amended to read as follows:
16-97-1. Rhode Island board of education established.
LC001570 - Page 2 of 5

(a) Effective January 1, 2013, there is created a board of education that shall be responsible
for and shall exercise the purposes, powers, and duties of, this chapter and chapters 59 and 60 of
this title. The board is responsible for the coordination of education from pre-K through higher
education and shall set goals and policies for the effective coordination of these public education
systems.
(b) The board of education shall consist of seventeen (17) nineteen (19) public members
appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate, eight (8) of whom shall be
designated to serve on the council on elementary and secondary education and eight (8) of whom
shall be designated to serve on the council on postsecondary education. The two (2) members of
the board not directly appointed by the governor shall be the Rhode Island teacher of the year and
the chairperson of the student advisory council whom shall be designated to serve on the council
on elementary and secondary education, each of whom shall be limited to one term and would have
to receive advise and consent from the senate. The chairperson of the board shall serve as a member
of both councils. Six (6) of the members initially appointed pursuant to this section shall serve
terms of three (3) years; six (6) members initially appointed pursuant to this section shall serve
terms of two (2) years; and, four (4) members initially appointed pursuant to this section shall serve
terms of one year. To the greatest extent possible, the initial staggered terms shall be equitably
divided among the councils so as to protect against sudden changes in membership and reversal of
policy. Thereafter, all members appointed pursuant to this section shall serve terms of three (3)
years. At the expiration of their terms, members shall remain and continue in their official capacity
until their successor is appointed and qualified. Members shall not be appointed to more than three
(3), successive three-year (3) terms each; provided that the chair of the board shall have no term
and shall serve at the pleasure of the governor. Any vacancy among the members of the board shall
be filled by appointment of the governor for the remainder of the unexpired term. In the selection
and appointment of the board, the governor shall seek persons who best serve the needs of the entire
state. No person shall be eligible for appointment to the board after the effective date of this act
unless a resident of this state. Members of the board shall not be compensated for their service in
attending board or council meetings.
(c) The chair of the Governor’s workforce board, or designee; the chair of the Rhode Island
commerce corporation, or designee; the chair of the university of Rhode Island board of trustees,
or designee; and the Rhode Island teacher of the year shall serve as non-voting, ex-officio members
of the board.
(d) The Rhode Island teacher of the year shall serve on the board for one year, beginning
after their term as teacher of the year has expired. If the teacher of the year is unable or unwilling
LC001570 - Page 3 of 5

to serve, a former Rhode Island teacher of the year may be selected to serve on the board by the
commissioner of elementary and secondary education; provided that, the individual is still teaching
in Rhode Island public schools.
(e) The governor shall select from the appointed members a chairperson and vice
chairperson. A quorum shall consist of nine (9) members of the board. A majority vote of those
present shall be required for action.
(f) Except as provided by subsection (b) of this section, members of the board shall be
removable by the governor for cause only. Removal solely for partisan or personal reasons
unrelated to performance, capacity, or fitness for the office shall be unlawful.
(g) The statutory responsibilities of the department of elementary and secondary education,
the commissioner of elementary and secondary education, and the commissioner of postsecondary
education shall remain unchanged.
(h) The chair of the board of education shall consult with the chairs of the council on
elementary and secondary education, the council on postsecondary education, the commissioner of
elementary and secondary education, and the commissioner of postsecondary education in
developing agendas, goals, policies, and strategic plans for the board.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001570
========
LC001570 - Page 4 of 5